apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="tr/å__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>eden</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>eden</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ådd</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ådd</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>åande</l> <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>åast</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ådd</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ått</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ede</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>år</l>    <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ådde</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>od</l>    <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="br/este__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>osten</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>est</l>   <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>esta</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>osten</l> <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>est</l>   <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>esta</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oste</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>osti</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>esta</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>este</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ostne</l> <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>esta</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>este</l>  <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ostne</l> <r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>estande</l><r>este<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<!-- wsd todo -->
<e r="LR"><p><l>esta</l>  <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>este</l>  <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>est</l>   <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>est</l><r>este</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>estast</l><r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>esta</l>  <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>est</l>   <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oste</l>  <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>osti</l>  <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>estar</l> <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ester</l> <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>est</l>   <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>esta</l>  <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>este</l>  <r>este<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="yst/e__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l><r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>oren</l>   <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oren</l>  <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ore</l>   <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ori</l>   <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>orne</l>  <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>orne</l>  <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>erande</l><r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>er</l><r>ere</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>erast</l> <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ore</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ori</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>erer</l>  <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="attvere">         <i>attv</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="unnvere">         <i>unnv</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="trå">             <i>tr</i><par n="tr/å__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="grunnfeste">  <i>grunnfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="trøyste">     <i>trøyst</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="breste">      <i>br</i><par n="br/este__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="frette">      <i>frett</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="løfte">       <i>løft</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lovfeste">    <i>lovfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tidfeste">    <i>tidfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="stadfeste">       <i>stadfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="målbere">         <i>målb</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gifte">           <i>gift</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="neste">           <i>nest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="miste">           <i>mist</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skifte">          <i>skift</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="beste">           <i>best</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="flytte">          <i>flytt</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="feste">           <i>fest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rette">           <i>rett</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="drøfte"><i>drøft</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="dyste"><i>dyst</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="elte"><i>elt</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forløfte"><i>forløft</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomdrøfte"><i>gjennomdrøft</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gløtte"><i>gløtt</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gravfeste"><i>gravfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hefte"><i>heft</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="heimfeste"><i>heimfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hudflette"><i>hudflett</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="jordfeste"><i>jordfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="korsfeste"><i>korsfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lyste"><i>lyst</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="makeskifte"><i>makeskift</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="melte"><i>melt</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="piste"><i>pist</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="programfeste"><i>programfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="regelfeste"><i>regelfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rotfeste"><i>rotfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skriftfeste"><i>skriftfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="talfeste"><i>talfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="trette"><i>trett</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvangsflytte"><i>tvangsflytt</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tørste"><i>tørst</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vedtektsfeste"><i>vedtektsfest</i><par n="yst/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
